Nebraska, session 109, LB980.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB980 LB980
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 76-1415, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1415 (1) No rental agreement may provide that the tenant:
(a) Agrees to waive or to forego rights or remedies under the
Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, except that parties may
agree to waive the right to a jury trial in an action for possession;
(b) Authorizes any person to confess judgment on a claim arising out
of the rental agreement;
(c) Agrees to pay the landlord's or tenant's attorney's fees; or
(d) Agrees to the exculpation or limitation of any liability of the
landlord arising due to active and actionable negligence of the landlord
or to indemnify the landlord for that liability arising due to active and
actionable negligence or the costs connected therewith.
(2) A provision prohibited by subsection (1) of this section
included in a rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord
deliberately uses a rental agreement containing provisions known by him
or her to be prohibited, the tenant may recover actual damages sustained
by him or her and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 2. Section 76-1442, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1442 (1) The summons shall be issued and directed, with a copy of
the complaint attached thereto, and shall state:
(a) The the cause of the complaint, the time and place of trial of
the action for possession, and the answer day for other causes of
action; ,
(b) Notice and notice that if the defendant fails to appear,
judgment shall be entered against him or her; .
(c) Notice that the defendant has the right to demand a jury trial
if the defendant has not waived such right in the rental agreement; and
(d) Notice that if the trial is by jury, the prevailing party may
recover court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
-2-

LB980 LB980
2026 2026
(2) The summons may be served and returned as in other cases or by
any person, except that the summons shall be served within three days,
excluding nonjudicial days, from the date of issuance and shall be
returnable within five days, excluding nonjudicial days, from the date of
issuance. The person making the service shall file with the court an
affidavit stating with particularity the manner in which he or she made
the service. If diligent efforts have been made to serve the summons in
the manner provided in sections 25-505.01 to 25-516.01 but such efforts
were unsuccessful, the summons may be served in the manner provided in
section 76-1442.01.
Sec. 3. Section 76-1446, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1446 (1) The proceedings for an action for possession shall be in
all respects as in other cases, except that:
(a) If the action will be tried by the court without a jury, the
trial shall be held not less than ten nor more than fourteen days after
the issuance of the summons; or
(b) If the action will be tried by a jury, the trial shall be
scheduled by the court as soon as is practicable for the proper
administration of justice. If the defendant requests a continuance of a
jury trial beyond the initial trial date as determined by the court, the
court may require the defendant to deposit with the clerk of the court
such rental payments as accrue during the pendency of the suit.
(2)(a) Either party may move for summary judgment, identifying each
claim or defense, or the part of each claim or defense, on which summary
judgment is sought. The court shall grant summary judgment if the movant
shows that there is no genuine dispute as to any material fact and the
movant is entitled to judgment as a matter of law.
(b) A party may file a motion for summary judgment at any time,
including upon filing the complaint or answer. The motion for summary
judgment shall include any documentation described in subdivision (2)(c)
-3-

LB980 LB980
2026 2026
of this section showing that there is no genuine dispute as to any
material fact.
(c) A party asserting that a fact cannot be or is genuinely disputed
must support the assertion by:
(i) Citing to particular parts of materials in the record, including
depositions, documents, electronically stored information, affidavits or
declarations, stipulations (including those made for purposes of the
motion only), admissions, interrogatory answers, or other materials; or
(ii) Showing that the materials cited do not establish the absence
or presence of a genuine dispute, or that an adverse party cannot produce
admissible evidence to support the fact.
(d) If a party fails to properly support an assertion of fact or
fails to properly address another party's assertion of fact, the court
may:
(i) Give an opportunity to properly support or address the fact;
(ii) Consider the fact undisputed for purposes of the motion;
(iii) Grant summary judgment if the motion and supporting materials
show that the movant is entitled to it; or
(iv) Issue any other appropriate order.
(e) If satisfied that an affidavit or declaration under this
subsection is submitted in bad faith or solely for delay, the court,
after notice and a reasonable time to respond, may order the submitting
party to pay the other party the court costs and reasonable attorney's
fees incurred as a result. An offending party or attorney may also be
held in contempt or subjected to other appropriate sanctions.
(3) A court may, after giving notice and a reasonable time to
respond, consider summary judgment on its own after identifying for the
parties material facts that may not be genuinely in dispute.
(4) Trial of the action for possession shall be held not less than
ten nor more than fourteen days after the issuance of the summons. The
action shall be tried by the court without a jury. If the plaintiff
-4-

LB980 LB980
2026 2026
serves the summons in the manner provided in section 76-1442.01, the
action shall proceed as other actions for possession except that a money
judgment shall not be granted for the plaintiff.
(5) If judgment is rendered against the defendant for the
restitution of the premises, the court (a) shall declare the forfeiture
of the rental agreement , and (b) shall, at the request of the plaintiff
or his or her attorney, issue a writ of restitution, directing the
constable or sheriff to restore possession of the premises to the
plaintiff on a specified date not more than ten days after issuance of
the writ of restitution.
(6) The plaintiff shall comply with the Disposition of Personal
Property Landlord and Tenant Act and subsection (5) of section 76-1414 in
the removal of personal property remaining on the premises at the time
possession of the premises is restored.
(7) In an action tried by a jury, the court may award the prevailing
party court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 4. Original sections 76-1415, 76-1442, and 76-1446, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-